Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5617XS (4) 91 jm/jh S.F. 2250 Section 1. Section 421.59, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. A taxpayer may authorize an individual to act on 3 behalf of the taxpayer by filing a power of attorney with 4 the department, on a form prescribed by the department. The 5 department may prescribe a separate form or shall integrate the 6 requirements of the form into a return when feasible. 7 Sec. 2. Section 421.59, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 8 by adding the following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. (1) If a due date has not yet passed, 10 the running of the time period leading up to the due date shall 11 be tolled on the date a power of attorney form is filed with the 12 department. 13 (2) The tolling of the time period pursuant to subparagraph 14 (1) ceases upon the date the power of attorney is authorized 15 or denied. 16 (3) This paragraph shall not be construed to toll any time 17 period in a criminal proceeding. 18 Sec. 3. Section 421.60, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 19 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 20 lieu thereof the following: 21 b. (1) The department shall furnish to the taxpayer an 22 explanation of the reasons for a proposed notice of assessment 23 or refund claim denial no less than thirty days before issuing 24 the notice. If the taxpayer requests a meeting before the 25 issuance of the notice of assessment or refund claim denial, 26 the department auditor and policy director, or compliance 27 supervisor or manager, if the policy director is not available 28 for the appropriate tax type in dispute, shall meet with the 29 taxpayer to discuss the explanation of the proposed assessment 30 or refund claim denial before issuing the notice. The meeting 31 shall be held in a format requested by the taxpayer that is 32 conducive to effective and efficient tax administration. 33 (2) An inadequate explanation shall not invalidate the 34 notice in subparagraph (1). However, if the notice does not 35 -1- LSB 5617XS (4) 91 jm/jh 1/ 5 S.F. 2250 present a particular factual or legal basis for the assessment 1 or refund claim denial, the department shall not allege a new 2 factual or legal basis for the assessment after the taxpayer 3 has timely filed an appeal. For purposes of this paragraph, 4 an explanation by the department shall be sufficient where 5 each factual and legal basis for the assessment or refund 6 claim denial is stated in the notice, and when applicable the 7 amount of tax, interest, and penalty is stated together with 8 an attachment setting forth the computation of the tax by the 9 department. 10 Sec. 4. Section 421.60, subsection 2, paragraph i, Code 11 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 i. The director shall adopt rules for setting times and 13 places for taxpayer interviews and to permit any taxpayer . Any 14 taxpayer shall be allowed to record the interviews. 15 Sec. 5. Section 421.60, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 16 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 17 following: 18 4. Costs. 19 a. (1) A prevailing taxpayer in an administrative 20 hearing or a court proceeding related to the determination, 21 collection, or refund of a tax, penalty, or interest shall be 22 awarded reasonable costs by the department or a court that are 23 incurred subsequent to the issuance of the notice of assessment 24 or refund claim denial in the proceeding, based upon the 25 following: 26 (a) Reasonable court costs. 27 (b) Reasonable prevailing market rates based upon the 28 services provided including but not limited to: 29 (i) Expert witnesses. 30 (ii) The cost of a study, engineering report, test, 31 analysis, or project that is found by the director of revenue 32 or court to be necessary for the preparation of the case of the 33 taxpayer. 34 (iii) Fees paid or incurred for the services of an 35 -2- LSB 5617XS (4) 91 jm/jh 2/ 5 S.F. 2250 accountant. 1 (iv) (A) Fees paid or incurred by the taxpayer for the 2 services of an independent attorney including fees paid or 3 incurred in obtaining costs under this subsection. 4 (B) The fees awarded pursuant to this subparagraph 5 subdivision shall be based upon an hourly rate of two hundred 6 fifty dollars an hour, unless the court determines a higher 7 hourly rate is justified due to special factors such as 8 the limited availability of qualified attorneys for such a 9 proceeding, the difficulty of the issues presented in the case, 10 or the local availability of tax expertise. Beginning January 11 1, 2027, and each January 1 thereafter, the hourly rate shall 12 be annually adjusted by the department of revenue by adding 13 to the hourly rate in existence prior to this calculation 14 the product of the hourly rate in existence prior to this 15 calculation multiplied by the most recent cost-of-living 16 adjustment in effect under section 1(f)(3) of the Internal 17 Revenue Code. 18 b. An award under paragraph âaâ shall not be made with 19 respect to any portion of the proceedings during which 20 the prevailing taxpayer has unreasonably protracted the 21 proceedings. 22 c. For purposes of this subsection, âprevailing taxpayerâ 23 means a taxpayer who has substantially prevailed with respect 24 to the amount in controversy or has substantially prevailed 25 with respect to the most significant issue or set of issues 26 presented. The determination of whether a taxpayer is a 27 prevailing taxpayer is to be determined in accordance with 28 chapter 17A. If the taxpayer establishes that the taxpayer 29 has substantially prevailed with respect to the amount in 30 controversy or has substantially prevailed with respect to the 31 most significant issue or set of issues presented, the burden 32 of proof shifts to the department of revenue to prove that the 33 position taken by the department was substantially justified. 34 If the department meets the burden by proving the position of 35 -3- LSB 5617XS (4) 91 jm/jh 3/ 5 S.F. 2250 the department was substantially justified, the taxpayer shall 1 not be considered a prevailing taxpayer. 2